Georgia, session 2025_26, SB187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
imposition, rate, computation, exemptions, and credits for state income tax, is amended by
revising subsection (c) of Code Section 48-7-29.2, relating to tax credits for qualified
caregiving expenses, as follows:
"(c)(1) In no event shall the amount of the tax credit exceed $150.00 $500.00 or the
taxpayer's income tax liability, whichever is less. Any unused tax credit shall not be
allowed to be carried forward to apply to the taxpayer's succeeding years' tax liability.
No such tax credit shall be allowed the taxpayer against prior years' tax liability."
S. B. 187
- 1 -

LC 59 0093
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 187
- 2 -